en: I/O Cards & Adapters
xx: I/O Cards & Adapters
cs: Rozšiřující počítačové karty
da: I/O-kort og -adaptere
de: Computer-Steckkarten
es: Tarjetas de expansión para ordenadores
fr: Cartes E/S
it: Schede di espansione per computer
ja: PC拡張カード
nl: Computeruitbreidingskaarten
no: I/O-kort og -adaptere
pl: Karty i adaptery I/O
pt: Placas de expansão para computadores
ru: Платы расширения для компьютеров
sv: I/O-kort och adaptrar
tr: Bilgisayar Genişletme Kartları

en: Audio Cards & Adapters
xx: Audio Cards & Adapters
cs: Zvukové karty
da: Lydkort og -adaptere
de: Soundkarten
es: Tarjetas de audio
fr: Cartes audio
it: Schede audio
ja: サウンドカード・アダプター
nl: Audiokaarten
no: Lydkort og adaptere
pl: Karty i adaptery audio
pt: Cartões e adaptadores de áudio
ru: Звуковые карты
sv: Ljudkort och adaptrar
tr: Ses Kartları ve Adaptörleri

en: Computer Interface Cards & Adapters
xx: Computer Interface Cards & Adapters
cs: Karty rozhraní a adaptéry pro počítače
da: Grænsefladekort- og adaptere til computer
de: Computer-Steckkarten & -Adapter
es: Adaptadores y tarjetas de interfaz de red
fr: Cartes et adaptateurs d'interface pour ordinateurs
it: Adattatori e schede di interfaccia per PC
ja: PCインターフェースカード・アダプター
nl: Interfacekaarten en adapters voor computers
no: Grensesnittkort og -adaptere
pl: Karty i adaptery do komputerów
pt: Adaptadores e cartões de interface para computador
ru: Интерфейсные платы и адаптеры для компьютеров
sv: Gränssnittskort och adaptrar för datorer
tr: Bilgisayar Arabirim Kartları ve Adaptörleri

en: Riser Cards
xx: Riser Cards
cs: Riser karty
da: Riser-kort
de: Riser-Karten
es: Placas hija
fr: Cartes d'adaptation
it: Scheda Riser
ja: ライザーカード
nl: Riser-kaarten
no: Ekspansjonskort
pl: Karty riser
pt: Riser cards
ru: Райзер-платы
sv: Riserkort
tr: Riser Kartlar

en: TV Tuner Cards & Adapters
xx: TV Tuner Cards & Adapters
cs: Televizní karty
da: Tv-kort og -adaptere
de: TV-Karten und -Adapter
es: Adaptadores y tarjetas sintonizadoras de televisión
fr: Cartes et adaptateurs TV
it: Schede sintonizzazione e adattatori TV
ja: TVチューナーカード・アダプター
nl: Kaarten en adapters voor tv-tuners
no: TV-tunerkort og -adaptere
pl: Karty i adaptery telewizyjne
pt: Placas e adaptadores para TV
ru: Платы и адаптеры ТВ-тюнеров
sv: TV-kort och adaptrar
tr: TV Kartları ve Adaptörleri

en: Video Cards & Adapters
xx: Video Cards & Adapters
cs: Grafické karty
da: Videokort og -adaptere
de: Grafikkarten & Videoadapter
es: Tarjetas de vídeo
fr: Cartes graphiques et adaptateurs vidéo
it: Schede video
ja: ビデオカード & グラフィックボード
nl: Videokaarten
no: Skjermkort og adaptere
pl: Karty i adaptery wideo
pt: Cartões gráficos e adaptadores de vídeo
ru: Видеокарты
sv: Grafikkort och adaptrar
tr: Ekran Kartları ve Adaptörleri

en: Input Device Accessories
xx: Input Device Accessories
cs: Vstupní zařízení – příslušenství
da: Inputenheder – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Eingabegeräte
es: Accesorios para dispositivos de entrada
fr: Accessoires pour périphériques de saisie
it: Accessori per dispositivi di input
ja: 入力デバイス関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor invoerapparatuur
no: Tilbehør til inndataenheter
pl: Akcesoria do urządzeń wejściowych
pt: Acessórios para dispositivos de entrada
ru: Принадлежности для устройств ввода
sv: Tillbehör till inmatningsenheter
tr: Giriş Aygıtı Aksesuarları

en: Barcode Scanner Stands
xx: Barcode Scanner Stands
cs: Stojany na skenery čárových kódů
da: Stregkodescanner – holder
de: Halterung für Strichcodeleser
es: Soportes para lectores de códigos de barras
fr: Supports pour lecteurs codes barres
it: Supporti per lettori di codici a barre
ja: バーコードリーダースタンド
nl: Steunen voor streepjescodescanners
no: Holdere for strekkodelesere
pl: Stojaki do skanerów kodów paskowych
pt: Suportes para leitores de códigos de barras
ru: Стойки для сканеров штрих-кодов
sv: Ställ för streckkodsläsare
tr: Brakod Tarayıcı Stantları

en: Game Controller Accessories
xx: Game Controller Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k herním ovladačům
da: Spilcontrollere – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Gamecontroller
es: Accesorios para mandos de videojuegos
fr: Accessoires pour manettes de jeu
it: Accessori per controller per videogiochi
ja: ゲームコントローラー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor gamecontrollers
no: Tilbehør til spillkontrollere
pl: Akcesoria do kontrolerów gier
pt: Acessórios para controles de videogames
ru: Принадлежности для игровых контроллеров
sv: Tillbehör för spelkontroller
tr: Oyun Kumandası Aksesuarları

en: Keyboard Keys & Caps
xx: Keyboard Keys & Caps
cs: Klávesy do klávesnic
da: Tastaturtaster og -kapper
de: Tastaturtasten & -kappen
es: Cubiertas y teclas para teclados
fr: Touches de clavier
it: Copritasto e tasti per tastiera
ja: キーボード用キー・キャップ
nl: Toetsen en kapjes voor toetsenborden
no: Tastaturtaster
pl: Klawisze do klawiatur i nakładki na klawisze
pt: Capas e teclas para teclados
ru: Клавиши и наклейки на клавиши клавиатуры
sv: Tantentbordstangenter och -knappar
tr: Klavye Tuşları ve Tuş Kapakları

en: Mice & Trackball Accessories
xx: Mice & Trackball Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k myším a trackballům
da: Tilbehør til mus og trackballs
de: Mäuse und Trackball-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para ratones y ratones de bola
fr: Accessoires pour souris et trackballs
it: Accessori per mouse e trackball
ja: マウス/トラックボール用アクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor muizen en trackballs
no: Tilbehør til mus og styrekuler
pl: Akcesoria do myszek i manipulatorów kulkowych
pt: Acessórios para mouse e trackball
ru: Принадлежности для мыши и трекбола
sv: Tillbehör till möss och styrkulor
tr: Fare ve İztopu Aksesuarları

en: Input Devices
xx: Input Devices
cs: Vstupní zařízení
da: Inputenheder
de: Eingabegeräte
es: Dispositivos de entrada
fr: Périphériques de saisie
it: Dispositivi di input
ja: 入力デバイス
nl: Invoerapparaten
no: Inndataenheter
pl: Urządzenia wejściowe
pt: Dispositivos de entrada
ru: Устройства ввода
sv: Inmatningsenheter
tr: Giriş Aygıtları

en: Barcode Scanners
xx: Barcode Scanners
cs: Skenery čárových kódů
da: Stregkodescannere
de: Strichcode-Scanner
es: Lectores de códigos de barras
fr: Lecteurs code-barres
it: Lettori di codici a barre
ja: バーコードスキャナー
nl: Streepjescodescanners
no: Strekkodelesere
pl: Skanery kodów kreskowych
pt: Scanners de códigos de barras
ru: Сканеры штрихкодов
sv: Streckkodläsare
tr: Barkod Tarayıcılar

en: Digital Note Taking Pens
xx: Digital Note Taking Pens
cs: Digitální pera
da: Penne til digitale noter
de: Digitale Stifte
es: Bolígrafos digitales
fr: Stylos numériques
it: Penne digitali
ja: デジタルペン
nl: Digitale pennen
no: Digitale notatpenner
pl: Długopisy cyfrowe
pt: Canetas digitais
ru: Цифровые ручки
sv: Digitala anteckningspennor
tr: Dijital Not Alma Kalemleri

en: Electronic Card Readers
xx: Electronic Card Readers
cs: Čtečky elektronických karet
da: Elektroniske kortlæsere
de: Elektronische Kartenlesegeräte
es: Lectores de tarjetas electrónicas
fr: Lecteurs de cartes électroniques
it: Lettore di schede
ja: 電子カードリーダー
nl: Elektronische kaartlezers
no: Elektroniske kortlesere
pl: Czytniki kart elektronicznych
pt: Leitores de cartão eletrônico
ru: Устройства для чтения магнитных карт и карт с чипом
sv: Elektroniska kortläsare
tr: Elektronik Kart Okuyucular

en: Fingerprint Readers
xx: Fingerprint Readers
cs: Čtečky otisků prstů
da: Fingeraftrykslæsere
de: Fingerabdruck-Lesegeräte
es: Lectores de huellas digitales
fr: Lecteurs d'empreintes
it: Lettori di impronte digitali
ja: 指紋リーダー
nl: Vingerafdruklezers
no: Fingeravtrykkslesere
pl: Czytniki linii papilarnych
pt: Leitores de impressão digital
ru: Устройства чтения отпечатков пальцев
sv: Fingeravtrycksläsare
tr: Parmak İzi Okuyucular

en: Game Controllers
xx: Game Controllers
cs: Herní ovladače
da: Spilcontrollere
de: Gamecontroller
es: Controladores de juegos
fr: Manettes de jeu
it: Controller per giochi
ja: ゲームコントローラー
nl: Gamecontrollers
no: Spillkontrollere
pl: Kontrolery do gier
pt: Controladores de jogos
ru: Игровые контроллеры
sv: Spelkontroller
tr: Oyun Kumandaları

en: Game Racing Wheels
xx: Game Racing Wheels
cs: Herní volanty
da: Rat til gaming
de: Gaming-Rennlenkräder
es: Volantes para videojuegos
fr: Volants de course de jeu
it: Volanti per videogiochi
ja: ハンドルコントローラー
nl: Racesturen
no: Gamingratt
pl: Kierownice do gier wyścigowych
pt: Volantes para jogos de corrida
ru: Игровые рули
sv: Spelrattar
tr: Yarış Direksiyonları

en: Game Remotes
xx: Game Remotes
cs: Dálkové herní ovladače
da: Fjernbetjeninger til gaming
de: Gaming-Fernbedienungen
es: Mandos inalámbricos para videojuegos
fr: Télécommandes de jeu
it: Controller di gioco
ja: ゲームリモコン
nl: Game-afstandsbedieningen
no: Spillfjernkontroller
pl: Kontrolery gier
pt: Controle remoto para jogos
ru: Пульты управления для игр
sv: Trådlösa handkontroller
tr: Oyun Uzaktan Kumandaları

en: Gaming Pads
xx: Gaming Pads
cs: Gamepady
da: Gamepads
de: Gaming Pads
es: Gaming pads
fr: Claviers de jeu
it: Gamepad
ja: ゲームパッド
nl: Gamepads
no: Gamingkontrollere
pl: Gamepady
pt: Gamepad
ru: Геймпады
sv: Handkontroller
tr: Oyun Pad'leri